Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1147.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 904. Residential building construction defect remedies.(a) Repairs required.--The builder of new or rehabilitated residential building construction sold or leased and registered in this Commonwealth shall repair or correct, at no cost to the purchaser, a defect, including a water infiltration issue, structural issue or any other problem, which substantially 123456789101112131415161718 impairs the use, value or safety of the residential building construction and may occur within a period of two years following the actual delivery by the builder or the builder's designee of the residential building to the purchaser. (b) Action permitted.--If a defect is brought to the attention of the builder within two years of actual delivery to the purchaser of the residential building, the following shall apply:(1) The builder shall have six months from the date of the notice of the defect to make the repair or correction.(2) If the repair or correction is not completed within six months from the date of the notice under paragraph (1), the purchaser shall be entitled to file an action for compliance with this section in a court of common pleas with jurisdiction over the residential building.(3) If the action for compliance under paragraph (2) is adjudicated in favor of the purchaser, the builder shall be liable for 150% of the cost of the repair or correction.(c) Applicability.--This section shall not apply to a defect that is cosmetic or covered by a warranty. Section 2. This act shall apply to residential buildings that were delivered within two years of the effective date of the addition of section 904 of the act.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1147PN1268 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324